Montana, session 2025, SB445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 5] may be cited as the "Montana
Transparency in Energy Economics Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares the following:
(1) It is necessary for residential and small commercial energy consumers to better understand the
operating characteristics and costs that affect their billing statements.
(2) Investor-owned utilities shall provide real-time data related to the operating costs of each
energy generating resource, the price of converting the energy into electricity, the price of transporting
electricity through transmission and distribution lines, and the events or disturbances that lead to higher prices
for consumers.
(3) It is necessary to provide consumers with the economics that affect their power bills using an
energy dashboard that is easy to access and navigate, user-friendly, and transparent.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 5], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Average residential customer" means a customer with 750 kilowatt hours of electricity
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 445

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 445.1
consumption each month.
(2) "Investor-owned utility" means a private company that is owned by shareholders, acts as a
public utility, and is regulated by the public service commission.
(3) "Load" means an end-use device or customer that receives power from the electric system.
(4) "Load-serving entities" means a utility or electricity supplier regulated by the public service
commission that supplies electricity directly to a consumer.
(5) "Energy dashboard" means a web-based source of real-time or dynamic real-time
approximations of grid energy operations that drive consumer economics.
(6) "Off-peak" means the time when less electricity is being consumed or a low-demand period.
(7) "Peak" means the time when the most electricity is being consumed or a high-demand period.
(8) "Public utility" means a public utility as defined in 69-3-101 that provides electric or natural gas
service. The term includes municipal utilities.
(9) "Transmission facilities" means facilities that are used to provide transmission services and are
owned, controlled, or operated by a public utility.
(10) "Transmission service provider" means an entity controlling or operating a transmission facility.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Energy dashboard -- reporting. (1) On or before June 1, 2026, an
energy dashboard must be designed, built, and hosted by investor-owned utilities to provide their customer
base with real-time reporting of publicly available data sets that include:
(a) the in-state rate-based electricity supply resources within an investor-owned utility's portfolio;
and
(b) the real-time, or best approximated real-time, electrical grid contribution for each rate-based
electricity supply resource in megawatt units and the unit cost for each megawatt hour. The dashboard must
compare each electricity supply resource's contribution to the electrical grid and its associated costs.
(2) The dashboard must provide the year-to-date contribution of each electricity supply resource's,
operating capacity, production cost, and the average cost for each megawatt hour.
(3) The investor-owned utility shall develop a formula to display the cost for each kilowatt hour of
each electricity supply resource as it relates to an average residential customer's monthly billing statement.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 445

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 445.1
(4) If an electricity supply resource surges in production cost or becomes unavailable during load
sustainment, the investor-owned utility shall provide that information to the dashboard.
(5) The investor-owned utility, applicable transmission service providers, and load-serving entities
may participate in open data sharing to ensure an investor-owned utility's dashboard provides:
(a) extreme peak and off-peak load events;
(b) transmission facility available import, export, and transfer capacity;
(c) the timing, size, and price for each megawatt hour of electricity market purchases and sales;
and
(d) grid reliability reports.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Public utility quarterly power source disclosure -- requirements. (1)
On or before June 1, 2026, notwithstanding any current provision in Title 69, a public utility shall provide its
customer base with a quarterly power source disclosure. The quarterly power source disclosure must include:
(a) the source of power consumed by customer class in kilowatt-hour units and the quarterly
average unit cost for each kilowatt hour consumed by power source; and
(b) sources of power by technology type that contribute to a public utility's resource portfolio
serving the customer base. The technology types are as follows:
(i) coal;
(ii) natural gas;
(iii) hydroelectric;
(iv) wind;
(v) solar; and
(vi) any additional energy generating resource that serves load.
(2) The quarterly power source disclosure must also include power purchased by a public utility on
behalf of its customer base during the quarterly period from noncontracted, same-day electricity markets.
(3) A public utility may provide the quarterly power disclosure within a customer's monthly billing
statement.

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 445

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 445.1
NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 5] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 69, chapter 3, and the provisions of Title 69, chapter 3, apply to [sections 1
through 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective June 1, 2026.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 445